Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 6
DISCONNECTION BY COURT DECREE - STATUTORY CITIES

31-12-601. Petition to disconnect territory.

When a tract or contiguous tracts of land, aggregating twenty or more acres in area, are embraced within the municipal limits of any city, which are upon or contiguous to the border thereof, the owners of said tracts of land may petition the district court for the county in which such land, or any part thereof, is situated to have the same disconnected from said city.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1101, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-401 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-602. Contents of petition.

The petition shall contain the following:

A description of the land sought to be disconnected;

An allegation that the land contains in the aggregate an area of twenty or more acres and is located upon or adjacent to the border of the city;

An allegation that no part of the land has been duly platted into lots and blocks as a part of or addition to the city;

An acknowledgment that, for a period of six years after the effective date of the disconnection, the land shall not be subdivided into lots or plats of smaller area than is required during such period for lots within the city adjoining the land sought to be disconnected under the applicable ordinances or regulations of such city;

An acknowledgment that the land shall not be used during said six-year period for industrial or commercial uses if, during such period, the applicable ordinances of the city prohibit such uses upon the area within the city adjoining such land;

An allegation that all taxes or assessments lawfully due upon the land up to the time of the filing of the petition have been fully paid.

Any decree of disconnection entered pursuant to this part 6 shall restrict the use of the land in the manner set forth in paragraphs (d) and (e) of subsection (1) of this section, but such restrictions shall not continue to apply to any land which, within six years after the effective date of the disconnection, is annexed back into the city.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1101, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-603. Hearing - decree - proviso.

Upon the filing of such petition in the district court, the judge thereof shall set a date for a hearing, not less than forty days nor more than sixty days thereafter. It is the duty of the clerk of said court to cause a copy of such petition and a notice of the date and the time set for such hearing to be served upon the mayor of the city. The same shall be served at least thirty days prior to the hearing of such petition by the court. Upon the hearing and proof of the facts set forth in said petition, it shall be determined whether said tracts of land should be disconnected from such city, and the court shall enter an order or decree accordingly. When a city has maintained streets, lights, and other public utilities for a period of three years through or adjoining said tracts of land, the owners shall not be entitled to disconnect the land under the provisions of this part 6.

If an area has been annexed to a city for a period of two years and then successful action is undertaken to disconnect such area, the disconnected land shall be made subject to the applicable county's zoning resolution and map and other land development regulations within ninety days after the effective date of the disconnection as described in section 31-12-501 (5).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1102, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(2) amended, (HB 20-1133), ch. 99, p. 385, § 2, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-604. Lands subject to tax for prior indebtedness.

The land so disconnected is not exempt from the payment of any taxes lawfully assessed against it for the purpose of paying any indebtedness lawfully contracted by the governing body of such city while such land was within the limits thereof and which remains unpaid and for the payment of which said land could be lawfully taxed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1102, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-12-605. Copy of decree filed.

Two copies of the order or decree of said court disconnecting any land described in said petition from any city, certified by the clerk of said court, shall be filed for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county in which such disconnected land, or any part thereof, is situated. The county clerk and recorder shall file the second certified copy with the division of local government in the department of local affairs, as provided by section 24-32-109, C.R.S. Such record or a copy of such order or decree, certified by the clerk of said court, shall be proof of the disconnection of such land.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1102, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-8-405 as it existed prior to 1975.